test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_fadda_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  
  Noun - čuhčá:
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  čuhčá
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  čuuhčán
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  čuuvčást
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  čuvččáin
    čuhčá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  čuvčáttáá
    čuhčá+v1+N+Ess:  čuhčán
    čuhčá+v1+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  čuuvčáh
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  [čuuvčái, čuvčái]
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  čuvččáid
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [čuvčáiguin, čuvčáigijn]
    čuhčá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  čuvčáittáá

  Noun - fáddá:
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com:  fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  fádáttáá
    fáddá+N+Ess:  fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [fáádái, fádái]
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com:  [fádáiguin, fádáigijn]
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  fádáittáá

  Noun - lággá:
    lággá+N+Sg+Nom:  lággá
    lággá+N+Sg+Gen:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Acc:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Ill:  láágán
    lággá+N+Sg+Loc:  láágást
    lággá+N+Sg+Com:  lággáin
    lággá+N+Sg+Abe:  lágáttáá
    lággá+N+Ess:  lággán
    lággá+N+Par: lággád
    lággá+N+Pl+Nom:  láágáh
    lággá+N+Pl+Gen:  [láágái, lágái]
    lággá+N+Pl+Acc:  láágáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Ill:  lággáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Loc:  láágáin
    lággá+N+Pl+Com:  [lágáiguin, lágáigijn]
    lággá+N+Pl+Abe:  lágáittáá

  Noun - lássá:
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom:  lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen:  láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc:  láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill:  láásán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc:  láásást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com:  lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe:  lásáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess:  lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom:  láásáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: [láásái, lásái]
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc:  láásáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill:  lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc:  láásáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com:  [lásáiguin, lásáigijn]
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe:  lásáittáá

  Noun - ráksá:
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom:  ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill:  rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com:  rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe:  rávsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess:  ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávsái, rávsái]
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill:  rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com:  [rávsáiguin, rávsáigijn]
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe:  rávsáittáá

  
  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákkán
    luákká+N+Par:  luákkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: luáhái
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  [luáháiguin, luáháigijn]
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáháittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiälháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: kiälhái
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  [kiälháiguin, kiälháigijn]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiälháittáá


  Noun - kuáddá:
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáddá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Acc: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com:  kuáddáin
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuádáttáá
    kuáddá+N+Ess:  kuáddán
    kuáddá+N+Par: kuáddád
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuádáh
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Gen: kuádái
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuádáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáddáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuádáin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Com:  [kuádáiguin, kuádáigijn]
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuádáittáá
  
  Noun - luokka: # - ok
    luokka+N+Sg+Nom:  luokka
    luokka+N+Sg+Gen:  luoka
    luokka+N+Sg+Acc:  luoka
    luokka+N+Sg+Ill:  luokan
    luokka+N+Sg+Loc:  luokkaast
    luokka+N+Sg+Com:  luokkain
    luokka+N+Sg+Abe:  luokattáá
    luokka+N+Ess:  luokkan
    luokka+N+Par:  luokkad
    luokka+N+Pl+Nom:  luokah
    luokka+N+Pl+Gen:  luokai
    luokka+N+Pl+Acc:  luokkaid
    luokka+N+Pl+Ill:  luokkaid
    luokka+N+Pl+Loc:  luokkain
    luokka+N+Pl+Com:  [luokaiguin, luokaigijn]
    luokka+N+Pl+Abe:  luokaittáá
